District of Columbia statutes.
7-503.05

Standards for grant and contract awards.

After consultation with the Commission on Aging established by § 7-504.01 the Director shall develop and publish the standards that the Office will use in making decisions on the award of grants and contracts.

History

Oct. 29, 1975, D.C. Law 1-24, title III, § 305, 22 DCR 2459

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2215.
1973 Ed., § 6-1715.